Hawaii, session 2025, HB1158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 266, Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§266-     Firefighting; limited liability.  Any person who renders firefighting services with a firefighting vessel upon a reasonable command by someone known to the person as a firefighter at any commercial harbor or roadstead, any commercial harbor or waterfront improvement belonging to or controlled by the State, or any vessel within a commercial harbor or roadstead shall not be liable for any civil damages resulting from the person's acts or omissions occurring during the course of firefighting, except for damages as may result from the person's gross negligence or wanton acts or omissions." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.